Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1062
Licensure by examination; requirements.

In order to be licensed by the department by examination, an individual shall meet, and present to the department evidence of meeting, the following requirements:

(1) Has attained the age of seventeen years on or before the beginning date of the examination for which application is being made;

(2) Has completed formal education equivalent to a United States high school education;

(3) Possesses a minimum competency in the knowledge and skills necessary to perform the practices for which licensure is sought, as evidenced by successful completion of an examination in the appropriate practices approved by the board and administered by the department;

(4) Possesses sufficient ability to read the English language to permit the applicant to practice in a safe manner, as evidenced by successful completion of the written examination; and

(5) Has graduated from a school of cosmetology or an apprentice salon in or outside of Nebraska, a school of esthetics in or outside of Nebraska, or a school of electrolysis upon completion of a program of studies appropriate to the practices for which licensure is being sought, as evidenced by a diploma or certificate from the school or apprentice salon to the effect that the applicant has complied with the following:

(a) For licensure as a cosmetologist, the program of studies shall consist of a minimum of one thousand eight hundred hours;

(b) For licensure as an esthetician, the program of studies shall consist of a minimum of six hundred hours;

(c) For licensure as a cosmetology instructor, the program of studies shall consist of a minimum of six hundred hours beyond the program of studies required for licensure as a cosmetologist;

(d) For licensure as a cosmetology instructor, be currently licensed as a cosmetologist in Nebraska, as evidenced by possession of a valid Nebraska cosmetology license;

(e) For licensure as an electrologist, the program of studies shall consist of a minimum of six hundred hours;

(f) For licensure as an electrology instructor, be currently licensed as an electrologist in Nebraska and have practiced electrology actively for at least two years immediately before the application; and

(g) For licensure as an esthetics instructor, completion of a program of studies consisting of a minimum of three hundred hours beyond the program of studies required for licensure as an esthetician and current licensure as an esthetician in Nebraska.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 48;

Laws 1987, LB 543, § 6;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 22;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 26;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 168;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 23;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 26;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-387;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 324;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 16.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.